Hawaii statutes.
§456-10 Duties, by mercantile usage.
It shall be a notary public's duty, when requested, to enter on record all
losses or damages sustained or apprehended, by sea or land, and also all
averages, and such other matters as, by mercantile usage, appertain to the
notary's office, and cause protest thereof to be made, duly and formally. [CC
1859, §1269; RL 1925, §3177; RL 1935, §5203; RL 1945, §7670; RL 1955, §168-10;
HRS §456-10; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next